District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.21

Replacement certificate of title.

(a)

If a written certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or otherwise becomes unavailable or illegible, the secured party of record or, if no secured party is indicated in the files of the Harbor Master, the owner of record may apply for and, by furnishing information satisfactory to the Harbor Master, obtain a replacement certificate of title in the name of the owner of record.

(b)

An applicant for a replacement certificate of title must sign the application, and, except as otherwise permitted by the Harbor Master, the application must comply with § 50-1541.06. The application must include the existing certificate of title unless the certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or otherwise unavailable.

(c)

A replacement certificate of title created by the Harbor Master must comply with § 50-1541.08 and indicate on the face of the certificate of title that it is a replacement certificate of title.

(d)

If a person receiving a replacement certificate of title subsequently obtains possession of the original written certificate of title, the person promptly shall destroy the original certificate of title.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 22, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.